Utah statutes.
17B-1-604.   Funds and account groups maintained.

Each district shall maintain, according to its own accounting needs, some or all of the funds and account groups in its system of accounts, as prescribed in the Uniform Accounting Manual for Local Districts.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

